Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.330

Criers and bailiffs.

Every court of record shall have the power to appoint a crier and as many bailiffs as may be necessary for the orderly and expeditious dispatch of the business.

[ 1891 c 54 s 13; RRS s 11052.]